Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Safety Equipment; Operation of Vessels

§ 59-21-81.
Requirements as to lights, personal flotation devices and other safety equipment; children required to wear personal flotation devices; vessels to be seaworthy; safety requirements for operation of personal watercraft.

Every vessel shall have on board a Coast Guard approved personal flotation device for each person aboard such vessel, and every person twelve (12) years or younger on board a motorboat, sailboat, or vessel which measures less than twenty-six (26) feet in length shall wear a type I, II, or III Coast Guard approved personal flotation device while such motorboat, sailboat, or vessel is underway. For the purpose of this section “underway” shall mean at all times except when a motorboat, sailboat, or vessel is anchored, moored, or aground. Every vessel shall have lights during the hours of darkness, which comply with all federal regulations applicable to vessels of its classification. Such vessel shall not be operated unless in a safe and seaworthy condition; the owner and operator shall employ such safety devices as may be necessary for the safe operation of such vessel, including an efficient natural or mechanical ventilating system when necessary for safe operation. In addition to the requirements imposed by this section, all vessels shall comply with all federal regulations applicable to vessels of such classification.

For purposes of this subsection, “personal watercraft” means a vessel which uses an inboard motor powering a water jet pump and which is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing or kneeling on the vessel, rather than the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel. A person shall not operate a personal watercraft unless each person on board or being towed behind is wearing a type I, type II or type III, personal flotation device approved by the United States Coast Guard.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-19; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 19; Laws, 1973, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 434; Laws, 2001, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 24, 2001.).

§ 59-21-83.
Operation of vessel in reckless or negligent manner, while operator is incapacitated, etc.

No vessel shall be operated within this state in a reckless or negligent manner or at a rate of speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the then existing circumstances or when the operator is so physically or mentally incapacitated as to be incapable of safely operating such vessel, or while the operator is under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics, or when such vessel is overloaded beyond its reasonable carrying capacity. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all watercraft operating on the waters of this state inclusive of, but not limited to, undocumented or unnumbered vessels and shall specifically include all vessels exempted from numbering by Section 59-21-5 and surfboards, aquaplanes, airboats, water skis or other watercraft.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-20; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 20; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 7, eff from and after June 15, 1964.

§ 59-21-85.
Age restrictions on operation of motorboats.

No motorboat required to be numbered under this chapter shall be operated by any person who is under the age of twelve (12) years, unless he possesses a certificate as required under this section and is also accompanied by a parent, guardian or other person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and qualified and capable of operating the same.

A motorboat required to be numbered under this chapter may not be operated by any person born after June 30, 1980, unless the person has completed a course in boating safety conducted or approved by the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and the person has in his immediate possession while operating a motorboat a certificate of satisfactory completion of the boating safety course.

The requirement of possessing a certificate under this subsection shall not apply to any person operating a motorboat that is rented from a person engaged in the business of renting motorboats.

Boating safety courses shall be held by the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, or instructors designated and approved by the department. The Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall issue a certificate to each person who satisfactorily completes the boating safety course.

In lieu of any other penalties provided for a violation of this chapter, a violation of this section is punishable by a fine of not less than Twenty-Five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-20; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 20; Laws, 1964, ch. 468, § 7; Laws, 1973, ch. 397, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 545, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 59-21-87.
Regulation of water skiing, aquaplaning, etc.

No person shall operate a motorboat on any waters of this state while towing a person on water skis, or on an aquaplane or similar device, without an observer in the boat in addition to the operator. Such observer shall be above ten years of age.

The provisions of the first paragraph of this section do not apply to a person engaged in a professional exhibition or a person participating in an official regatta, motorboat race, marine parade, tournament or exhibition.

No person shall operate or manipulate any motorboat, tow rope or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, aquaplane, or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, aquaplane, or similar device, or any person thereon to collide or strike against any object or person, except slalom buoys, ski jumps or like objects used normally in competitive or recreational skiing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496-21; Laws, 1960, ch. 165, § 21; Laws, 1962, ch. 220, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 59-21-89.
Use of oscillating or rotating blue lights on vessels.

It is unlawful for any person, other than a law enforcement officer on duty, to use or display oscillating or rotating blue lights on a vessel operating on the public waters of this state. Upon the approach of an authorized law enforcement vessel operating a strobe, rotating or oscillating blue light or giving audible signal by siren or both, the operator of a vessel shall yield the right-of-way and shall stop and remain in position until the authorized law enforcement vessel has passed, except when otherwise directed by a law enforcement officer.

A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 640, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 476; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 600, § 1, eff from and after July 2, 1995.